New York, session 2025-2026, A11439.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 4 of chapter 573 of the laws of 2011, amending the 2 correction law relating to the boarding of out of state inmates at local 3 correctional facilities, as amended by chapter 302 of the laws of 2023, 4 is amended to read as follows: 5 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire September 6 1, [2026] 2029 when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be 7 deemed repealed. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14848-01-6